Illinois, session 104th, HB5258.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by changing 5Section 5.945 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/5.945)7    Sec. 5.945. The Medicaid Technical Assistance Center Fund. 8Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in addition to any 9other transfers that may be provided by law, on July 1, 2026, 10or as soon thereafter as practical, the State Comptroller 11shall direct, and the State Treasurer shall transfer the 12remaining balance from the Medicaid Technical Assistance 13Center Fund into the Healthcare Provider Relief Fund. Upon 14completion of the transfers, the Medicaid Technical Assistance 15Center Fund is dissolved, and any future deposits due to that 16Fund and any outstanding obligations or liabilities of that 17Fund pass to the Healthcare Provider Relief Fund. 18(Source: P.A. 102-4, Article 185, Section 185-90, eff. 194-27-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22.) 20    Section 10. The Medicaid Technical Assistance Act is 21amended by changing Sections 185-5 and 185-15 as follows:   HB5258 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 20212 KTG 33663 b1    (305 ILCS 75/185-5)2    Sec. 185-5. Definitions. As used in this Act:3    "Behavioral health providers" includes providers of mental 4health, substance use disorder, developmental disabilities, 5and autism services for purposes of this Act, but does not 6change any other legal, programmatic, diagnostic, or clinical 7provisions defining or relating to coverage of such services. 8means mental health and substance use disorder providers.9    "Department" means the Department of Healthcare and Family 10Services.11    "Health care providers" means individuals and 12organizations who provide physical, mental, substance use 13disorder, or services supporting social determinants 14determinant of health services.15    "Health equity" means providing care that does not vary in 16quality because of personal characteristics such as gender, 17ethnicity, geographic location, and socioeconomic status. 18    "Network adequacy" means a Medicaid beneficiaries' ability 19to access all necessary provider types within time and 20distance standards as defined in the Managed Care Organization 21model contract.22    "Service deserts" means geographic areas of the State with 23no or limited Medicaid providers that accept Medicaid.24    "Social determinants of health" means any conditions that 25impact an individual's health, including, but not limited to, 26access to healthy food, safety, education, and housing   HB5258 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 20212 KTG 33663 b1stability.2    "Stakeholders" means, but are not limited to, health care 3providers, advocacy organizations, managed care organizations, 4Medicaid beneficiaries, and State and city partners.5(Source: P.A. 102-4, eff. 4-27-21.) 6    (305 ILCS 75/185-15)7    Sec. 185-15. Collaboration. The Medicaid Technical 8Assistance Center shall collaborate with public and private 9partners throughout the State to identify, establish, and 10maintain best practices necessary for health providers to 11ensure their capacity to participate in the Illinois Medical 12Assistance Program. The Medicaid Technical Assistance Center 13shall promote equitable delivery systems, remaining committed 14to the principle that all Medicaid recipients have accessible 15and equitable physical and mental health care services 16HealthChoice Illinois or YouthCare. The Medicaid Technical 17Assistance Center shall administer the following:18        (1) Outreach and engagement: The Medicaid Technical 19    Assistance Center shall undertake efforts to identify and 20    engage community-based providers offering services to 21    customers funded by the Department, including, but not 22    limited to, behavioral health services and or services 23    addressing the social determinants of health, especially 24    those predominantly serving communities of color or those 25    operating within or near service deserts, for the purpose   HB5258 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 20212 KTG 33663 b1    of offering training and technical assistance to them 2    through the Medicaid Technical Assistance Center. Outreach 3    and engagement services may be subcontracted.4        (2) Trainings: The Medicaid Technical Assistance 5    Center shall create and administer ongoing trainings for 6    health care providers. Trainings may be subcontracted. The 7    Medicaid Technical Assistance Center shall provide 8    in-person and web-based trainings. In-person training 9    shall be conducted throughout the State. All trainings 10    must be free of charge. The Medicaid Technical Assistance 11    Center shall administer post-training surveys and 12    incorporate feedback. Training content and delivery must 13    be reflective of Illinois providers' varying levels of 14    readiness, resources, and client populations.15        (3) Web-based resources: The Medicaid Technical 16    Assistance Center shall maintain an independent, easy to 17    navigate, and up-to-date website that includes, but is not 18    limited to: recorded training archives, a training 19    calendar, provider resources and tools, up-to-date 20    explanations of Department and managed care organization 21    guidance, a running database of frequently asked questions 22    and contact information for key staff members of the 23    Department, managed care organizations, and the Medicaid 24    Technical Assistance Center.25        (4) Learning collaboratives: The Medicaid Technical 26    Assistance Center shall host regional learning   HB5258 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 20212 KTG 33663 b1    collaboratives that will supplement the Medicaid Technical 2    Assistance Center training curriculum to bring together 3    groups of stakeholders to share issues and best practices, 4    and to escalate issues. Leadership of the Department and 5    managed care organizations shall attend learning 6    collaboratives on a quarterly basis.7        (5) Network recruitment plan: Using reports and data 8    provided by the Department's External Quality Review 9    Organization on adequacy reports: The Medicaid Technical 10    Assistance Center shall publicly release a report on 11    Medicaid provider network adequacy, within the first 3 12    years of implementation and annually thereafter. The 13    reports shall identify provider service deserts, and 14    health care disparities by race and ethnicity, the 15    Medicaid Technical Assistance Center shall propose for 16    Department review and approval an annual plan for 17    recruiting providers to participate in the Illinois 18    Medical Assistance Program and report on outcomes of its 19    recruitment efforts to the Department for continuous 20    improvement. Recruitment plans shall prioritize efforts to 21    bolster access in provider service deserts and in 22    communities experiencing health care disparities by race 23    and ethnicity, with a special focus on behavioral health 24    services and services that address social determinants of 25    health.26        (6) Equitable delivery system: The Medicaid Technical   HB5258 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 20212 KTG 33663 b1    Assistance Center is committed to the principle that all 2    Medicaid recipients have accessible and equitable physical 3    and mental health care services. All providers served 4    through the Medicaid Technical Assistance Center shall 5    deliver services notwithstanding the patient's race, 6    color, gender, gender identity, age, ancestry, marital 7    status, military status, religion, national origin, 8    disability status, sexual orientation, order of protection 9    status, as defined under Section 1-103 of the Illinois 10    Human Rights Act, or immigration status.11(Source: P.A. 102-4, eff. 4-27-21.) 12    (305 ILCS 75/185-20 rep.)13    (305 ILCS 75/185-25 rep.)14    Section 15. The Medicaid Technical Assistance Act is 15amended by repealing Sections 185-20 and 185-25. 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 172026.